Wisconsin, session 2025, SB17.
do enact as follows:SB17,11Section 1. 940.203 (2) (intro.), (a) and (b) of the statutes are amended to 2read:SB17,2,63940.203 (2) (intro.) Whoever intentionally causes bodily harm or threatens to 4cause bodily harm to the person or family member of any judge, prosecutor, or law 5enforcement officer, or community service officer under all of the following 6circumstances is guilty of a Class H felony:SB17,2,107(a) At the time of the act or threat, the actor knows or should have known that 8the victim is a judge, prosecutor, or law enforcement officer, or community service 9officer or a member of the judge’s, prosecutor’s, or law enforcement officer’s, or 10community service officer’s family.SB17,2,1211(b) The act or threat is in response to any action taken by a judge, prosecutor, 12or law enforcement officer, or community service officer in an official capacity.SB17,2,1313